Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.08.060

Capital notes or debentures.

(1) With the prior written approval of the director, any state trust company may at any time, through action of its board of directors, issue and sell its capital notes or debentures, which shall be subordinate to the claims of depositors and other creditors.

(2) Unless otherwise approved by the director, a state trust company shall conform to all other conditions and requirements of chapter 30A.36 RCW governing capital notes and debentures of state banks.

[ 2014 c 37 s 327.]